cs: Typ tvarování chrániče zubů: Tvarování varem (boil-and-bite); Na míru od zubaře; Okamžité přizpůsobení; Předtvarovaný; Jiný
tr: Ağız koruyucu kalıp tipi: Kaynat ve ısır; Özel diş kalıbı; Anında özel kalıp; Önceden şekillendirilmiş; Diğer
lt-LT: Burnos apsaugos formavimo tipas: Suformuojama karštu vandeniu; Individualiai pritaikoma odontologo; Greitas individualus pritaikymas; Iš anksto suformuota; Kita
zh-TW: 護齒套塑形類型: 加熱咬合式; 訂製牙齒貼合; 即時客製化貼合; 預成型; 其他
ru: Тип формовки капы: Формуемая при нагреве («свари и укуси»); Индивидуальная стоматологическая форма; Моментальная индивидуальная форма; Предварительно отформованная; Другое
nb: Type munnbeskytterform: Kok og bit; Spesialtilpasset hos tannlege; Umiddelbar spesialtilpasning; Forhåndsformet; Annet
en: Mouthguard mold type: Boil-and-bite; Custom dental fit; Instant custom fit; Pre-formed; Other
de: Typ der Mundschutzform: Boil-and-Bite; Individuelle zahnärztliche Anpassung; Sofortige individuelle Anpassung; Vorgeformt; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta kalupa za štitnik za zube: Za kuhanje i zagriz; Izrada po mjeri zuba; Trenutna prilagodba; Unaprijed oblikovano; Ostalo
th: แม่พิมพ์เมาท์การ์ด: ต้มและกัด; สั่งทำตามรูปฟัน; เข้ารูปได้ทันที; ขึ้นรูปมาแล้ว; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de matriță pentru gutieră: Fierbere și mușcare (boil-and-bite); Potrivire dentară personalizată; Potrivire personalizată instantanee; Preformată; Altele
el: Τύπος καλουπιού προστατευτικού στόματος: Τύπου boil-and-bite; Εξατομικευμένη οδοντιατρική εφαρμογή; Άμεση εξατομικευμένη εφαρμογή; Προσχηματισμένο; Άλλο
es: Tipo de moldeado del protector bucal: Hervir y morder; Ajuste dental personalizado; Ajuste personalizado instantáneo; Preformado; Otro
fr: Mode d’ajustement du protège-dents: Thermomoulable (bouillir et mordre); Empreinte dentaire sur mesure; Ajustement personnalisé instantané; Préformé; Autre
ja: マウスガード金型タイプ: ボイル＆バイト; カスタムデンタルフィット; インスタントカスタムフィット; 成形済み; その他
sk-SK: Typ formy na chránič zubov: Tvarovateľné vo vode (boil-and-bite); Na mieru (od zubára); Okamžité prispôsobenie; Tvarované výrobcom; Iné
nl: Gebitsbeschermer vormtype: Boil-and-bite; Aangepaste tandheelkundige pasvorm; Directe pasvorm op maat; Voorgevormd; Overig
vi: Khuôn bảo vệ miệng: Đun sôi và tự cắn khớp; Vừa vặn theo khuôn răng nha khoa; Vừa vặn cá nhân ngay lập tức; Định hình sẵn; Khác
zh-CN: 护齿器模具类型: 水煮咬合定型; 定制牙科贴合; 即时定制贴合; 预成型; 其他
pt-BR: Protetor bucal tipo de moldagem: Moldável em água quente (ferver e morder); Molde odontológico sob medida; Molde sob medida instantâneo; Pré-moldado; Outros
sv: Typ av tandskydd: Koka och bita; Tandläkaranpassad; Direkt anpassningsbar; Förformad; Övrigt
fi: Hammassuojan muotin tyyppi: Keitettävä ja muovattava; Hammaslääkärin muovaama; Välitön yksilöllinen sovitus; Esivalmistettu; Muu
it: Tipo di modellatura del paradenti: Termoformabile; Su misura (impronta dentale); Regolazione personalizzata istantanea; Preformato; Altro
ko: 마우스가드 몰드 유형: 보일앤바이트; 맞춤형 덴탈 핏; 인스턴트 맞춤형 핏; 사전 성형; 기타
bg-BG: Тип оформяне на протектор за уста: За оформяне след преваряване; По индивидуална зъболекарска мярка; Незабавно персонализирано оформяне; Предварително оформен; Друго
pl: Typ formy ochraniacza na zęby: Termoformowalne (gotuj i gryź); Dopasowanie stomatologiczne na zamówienie; Błyskawiczne dopasowanie; Wstępnie formowane; Inne
hu: Fogvédőlenyomat típusa: Főzhető és harapható; Egyedi fogászati illeszkedés; Azonnali egyedi illeszkedés; Előre formázott; Egyéb
pt-PT: tipo de molde de protetor bucal: Ferver e morder; Ajuste dentário personalizado; Ajuste personalizado instantâneo; Pré-moldada; Outro
da: Tilpasningstype for tandbeskytter: Kog-og-bid; Specialtilpasset tandform; Øjeblikkelig specialtilpasning; Forhåndsformet; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta oblikovanja ščitnika za zobe: Skuhaj in ugrizni (boil-and-bite); Po meri (zobozdravstveno); Takojšnje prileganje po meri; Predhodno oblikovano; Drugo